Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1150
Regional network, school, or center;
remittance of money.

All money derived from any
source other than General Fund appropriations by any regional
network, school, or center as provided in sections
79-1148 and 79-1149 shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to
the State Department of Education Cash Fund, and such money shall be made
available to any such regional network, school, or center for
purposes of education, training, or maintenance of students.

Laws 1965, c. 382, § 2, p. 1234;

Laws 1972, LB 1000, § 3;

Laws 1978, LB 871, § 29;

R.S.1943, (1984), § 43-619;

Laws 1987, LB 367, § 39;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-3339;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 832;

Laws 2009, LB549, § 43.